Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.04
Department, defined.

Department means the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 736;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5808;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 634.